Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 26A Court of Justice

26A.010.
Collection of judgment — Damages. [Renumbered KRS 26A.300.]

26A.012.
Persons with disabilities or members of their families to be included in membership of boards and committees affecting them — Prohibition against discrimination.

To ensure opportunities for participation by persons with disabilities and their families in the development of policies, support, and services that affect them:

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities, or members of their families, who may be affected by or be the subject of an advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee, shall be included in the membership of each advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee of the judicial branch.

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities, or members of their families, shall be included in the membership of any advisory committee, board, or commission of the judicial branch whose mission or purpose is to make recommendations or to establish criteria for services and support for persons with disabilities or to develop standards that govern the services and support funded or administered by any state government agency.

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities shall not be discriminated against and shall be given an equal opportunity to be included in the membership of any other advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act.

As used in this section “disability” has the same meaning as in KRS

12.450

.

The requirements of this section shall affect all boards, committees, commissions, task forces, or ad hoc committees created on or after June 21, 2001.

For boards, committees, commissions, task forces, or ad hoc committees in existence prior to June 21, 2001, any vacancy arising on or after June 21, 2001, shall be filled pursuant to this section.

The requirements of this section shall only apply to an advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee that is created specifically to develop or oversee policies or programs related to persons living with a disability or their families, except that the provisions of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section shall apply.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 336, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 2001, ch. 164, § 16, effective June 21, 2001.

26A.013.
Employment in decision-making positions and participation in programs consistent with the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act — Disability awareness program.

To ensure that Kentuckians with disabilities and their families enjoy full partnership in all programs, services, and activities throughout the Commonwealth:

Consistent with this subsection, consideration shall be given to persons with one (1) or more disabilities for employment in decision-making positions in the judicial branch of government. Persons with one (1) or more disabilities shall not be discriminated against and shall be given an equal opportunity to be employed in decision-making positions in programs created or under the jurisdiction of the judicial branch consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;

Individuals with disabilities shall be given equal opportunity to participate in the programs established by the judicial branch consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;

If not already a part of staff development training for the judicial branch, a program shall be developed with a disability awareness component;

If program evaluation criteria are utilized by the judicial branch for its programs, services, and activities, the criteria may include in the measures of performance, the number of individuals served by the program, service, or activity.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 164, § 15, effective June 21, 2001.